Maryland, session 2026, SB0214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–715.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0214*

SENATE BILL 214
(e) (1) Every owner of a vessel subject to titling under the provisions of this
subtitle shall apply to the Department for issuance of a certificate of title for the vessel
within 30 days after acquisition.
(2) The application shall [be]:
(I) BE on forms the Department prescribes, and accompanied by the
required fee and tax[. The application shall be];
(II) BE signed and sworn to before a notary public or other person
who administers oaths, or a certification signed in writing containing substantially the
representation that statements made are true and correct to the best of the applicant’s
knowledge, information, and belief, under penalty of perjury[. The application shall
contain];
(III) CONTAIN the date of sale and gross price of the vessel or the fair
market value if no sale immediately preceded the transfer[,];
(IV) IF THE SOLE INDIVIDUAL OWNER OF A VESSEL DESIGNATES
A TRANSFER–ON–DEATH BENEFICIARY UNDER § 8–720.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDE THE NAME AND MAILING ADDRESS OF THE BENEFICIARY; and [any]
(V) CONTAIN ANY additional information the Department requires.
(3) If the application is made for a vessel last previously registered or titled
in another state or foreign country, the application shall contain this information and any
other the Department requires.
8–720.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “VESSEL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–716 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS THE SOLE OWNER OF A VESSEL MAY APPLY TO
THE DEPARTMENT TO DESIGNATE A BENEFICIARY TO TAKE OWNERSHIP OF THE
VESSEL ON THE DEATH OF THE OWNER.
(C) THE DESIGNATION OF A BENEFICIARY MAY BE SHOWN BY THE WORDS
“TRANSFER–ON–DEATH” OR THE ABBREVIATION “TOD” AFTER THE NAME OF THE
REGISTERED OWNER ON A CERTIFICATE OF TITLE.
(D) (1) THE DESIGNATION OF A BENEFICIARY FOR A VESSEL DOES NOT
AFFECT THE OWNERSHIP OF THE VESSEL UNTIL THE DEATH OF THE OWNER OF THE
VESSEL.

SENATE BILL 214 3
(2) THE OWNER OF A VESSEL MAY CANCEL OR CHANGE THE
DESIGNATION OF A BENEFICIARY AT ANY TIME WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE
BENEFICIARY BY APPLYING TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) THE DESIGNATION OF A BENEFICIARY IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE
SUPPORTED BY CONSIDERATION, AND THE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE OF THE VESSEL
FOR WHICH THE DESIGNATION IS MADE IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE DELIVERED TO THE
BENEFICIARY IN ORDER FOR THE DESIGNATION TO BE EFFECTIVE.
(F) ON THE DEATH OF THE OWNER OF A VESSEL WHO HAS DESIGNATED A
BENEFICIARY, OWNERSHIP OF THE VESSEL SHALL PASS TO THE BENEFICIARY IF THE
BENEFICIARY SURVIVES THE OWNER.
(G) (1) A DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY WHO SURVIVES THE OWNER SHALL
APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A NEW CERTIFICATE OF TITLE FOR THE VESSEL.
(2) AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF TITLE BY A BENEFICIARY
FOLLOWING THE DEATH OF THE OWNER SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE ORIGINAL CERTIFICATE OF TITLE DESIGNATING THE
BENEFICIARY;
(II) A DEATH CERTIFICATE FOR THE DECEASED OWNER;
(III) PROOF OF THE IDENTITY OF THE BENEFICIARY; AND
(IV) ANY APPLICABLE TAXES OR FEES.
(H) IF A DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY DOES NOT SURVIVE THE DEATH OF THE
OWNER, THE VESSEL IS PART OF THE ESTATE OF THE DECEASED OWNER.
(I) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT THE RIGHTS OF CREDITORS OF VESSEL
OWNERS AGAINST BENEFICIARIES AND OTHER TRANSFEREES UNDER OTHER LAWS
OF THIS STATE.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE A FEE, NOT TO EXCEED THE COSTS TO
THE DEPARTMENT, FOR ISSUING A CERTIFICATE OF TITLE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(K) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.